Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 6

Vocational Rehabilitation of the Blind

71-4-601. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Vocational Rehabilitation of the Blind Law.”

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-625, 14-14-401.

71-4-602. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blind individual” means any person whose visual acuity with maximum correction does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye, except that in those instances in which the visual acuity exceeds 20/200 but is accompanied by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees (20°), visual acuity is not a factor limiting eligibility. Those clients with serious eye disabilities not covered by this subdivision (1) will be accepted for services when referred to the division by the division of vocational rehabilitation, in the department of education; provided, that such referrals are supported by appropriate justification, and that the client is otherwise eligible. Likewise, when it is determined through careful evaluation of all factors that a client who is eligible under this subdivision (1) for services of the division can more adequately be served by the division of vocational rehabilitation, such client will be referred to that agency for services and will be accepted; provided, that the referral is justified by supporting evidence and the client is otherwise eligible for the services of that agency;

“Blind individual with an employment barrier” means a person who is blind, and whose blindness constitutes a substantial barrier to employment;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Director” means the director of the division of services for the blind;

“Division” means the division of services for the blind in the department of human services;

“Eligible individual with employment barriers” when used with respect to diagnostic and related services, training guidance and placement, means any blind individual with a disability who is a citizen of this state, whose vocational rehabilitation is determined feasible by the division of vocational rehabilitation, and when used with respect to other vocational rehabilitation services, means an individual meeting the requirements of this subdivision (7) who is also found by the division to require financial assistance with respect to vocational rehabilitation services, after full consideration of the person's eligibility for any similar benefit by the way of pension, compensation and insurance;

“Establishment of a workshop or rehabilitation facility” means:

In the case of a workshop, the construction of a new building or the expansion, remodeling, or alteration of existing buildings, necessary to adapt such buildings to workshop purposes or to increase the employment opportunities in workshops, and the acquisition of initial equipment necessary for new workshops or to increase the employment opportunities in workshops; and

In the case of a rehabilitation facility, the construction of a new building or the expansion, remodeling, or alteration of existing buildings, and initial equipment of such buildings, necessary to adapt such buildings to rehabilitation facility purposes or to increase their effectiveness for such purposes and initial staffing;

“Maintenance” means the provision of money on behalf of a blind individual with employment barriers to cover the necessary living expenses, and health and maintenance essential to achieving the individual's vocational rehabilitation;

“Nonprofit,” when used with respect to a rehabilitation facility or a workshop, means a rehabilitation facility and a workshop, respectively, owned and operated by a corporation or association, no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual and the income of which is exempt from taxation under § 101(6) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 101(6));

“Physical restoration” includes:

Corrective surgery or therapeutic treatment necessary to correct or substantially modify a physical or mental condition that is stable or slowly progressive and that constitutes a substantial barrier to employment, or that necessitates institutional care or attendant care, but that is of such a nature that such correction or modification may reasonably be expected to eliminate or substantially reduce such barrier within a reasonable length of time, and includes psychiatric treatment, dentistry, physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech or hearing therapy, treatment of medical complications and emergencies that are associated with or arise out of physical restoration services or are inherent in the conditions under treatment, and other medical services related to rehabilitation;

Necessary hospitalization, either inpatient or outpatient, nursing or rest home care, in connection with surgery or treatment specified in subdivision (11)(A);

Prosthetic devices essential to obtaining or retaining employment, or to achieving such ability of independent living as to dispense with the need for expensive institutional care or dispense with or largely dispense with the need of an attendant at home;

“Prosthetic appliance” means any appliance designed to support or take the place of a part of the body, or to increase the acuity of a sensory organ;

“Rehabilitation facility” means a facility operated for the primary purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of physically handicapped individuals:

That provides one (1) or more of the following types of services:

Testing, fitting, or training in the use of prosthetic devices;

Prevocational or conditioning therapy;

Physical or occupational therapy;

Adjustment training; or

Evaluation or control of special disabilities; or

Through which is provided an integrated program of medical, psychological, social, and vocational evaluation and services under competent professional supervision;

“Remunerative occupation” includes employment as an employee or self-employed, practice of a profession, homemaking or farm and family work for which payment is in kind rather than cash, sheltered employment, and home industry or other homebound work of a remunerative nature;

“Vocational rehabilitation” means making an individual able, or increasing an individual's ability to:

Engage in a remunerative occupation; or

Dispense with or largely dispense with the need of an attendant at home or expensive institutional care, through providing the individual needed vocational rehabilitation services;

“Vocational rehabilitation services” means:

Diagnostic and related services, including transportation, incidental to the determination of whether an individual is a blind individual with employment barriers, and if so, the individual's eligibility for, and the nature and scope of other vocational rehabilitation services to be provided; and

The following services provided eligible blind individuals with employment barriers needing such services:

Training;

Guidance;

Placement;

Maintenance, not exceeding the estimated costs of subsistence during vocational rehabilitation;

Occupational licenses, tools, equipment, initial stocks, including livestock, and supplies, including equipment and initial stocks and supplies for vending stands, books, and training materials to any or all of which the state may retain title;

Transportation, other than provided as diagnostic and related services; and

Physical restoration; and

“Workshop” means a place where any manufacture or handiwork is carried on and that is operated for the primary purpose of providing remunerative employment to individuals with severe disabilities who cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 3; 1957, ch. 79, § 1; 1959, ch. 174, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, §§ 1 (a, b), 2 (a, b); Acts 1977, ch. 19, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-626, 14-14-402; Acts 2011, ch. 47, §§ 98-103.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Division of vocational rehabilitation of the blind, §71-4-604.

71-4-603. Declaration of policy — Plan.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to provide rehabilitation services, to the extent needed and feasible, to eligible blind individuals with employment barriers throughout the state to the end that they may engage in useful and remunerative occupations to the extent of their capabilities, thereby increasing their social and economic well-being and that of their families, and the productive capacity of this state and of the nation, and also thereby reducing the burden of dependency on families and taxpayers.

Pursuant to such policy, the vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided under this part to blind citizens throughout the state, and the vocational rehabilitation plan adopted pursuant to this part shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the state.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-627, 14-14-403; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 104.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-4-604. Creation of division of vocational rehabilitation of the blind — Director — Appointment — Regulations and state plan.

The division of vocational rehabilitation of the blind, called “the division” in this part, and the office of director of rehabilitation of the blind, the incumbent of which is called the “director,” in this part are hereby established in the department of human services.

The director shall be appointed, in accordance with established personnel standards, on the basis of training, experience and demonstrated ability in the field of vocational rehabilitation, or related fields, with the approval of the commissioner, and shall be the head of the division.

Except as may be otherwise provided with respect to the blind, the division shall be the sole state agency to supervise and administer vocational rehabilitation services authorized by this part, under the state plan formulated and administered pursuant to this part, except such part or parts of the vocational rehabilitation services as may be administered in a political subdivision or subdivision of this state by a sole local agency of the subdivision, and the division shall be the sole agency to supervise such local agency or agencies in the administration of such part or parts of the vocational rehabilitation services.

The director shall prepare, conformable to this part, the proposed regulations and a proposed state plan of vocational rehabilitation, and from time to time prepare such proposed changes as shall appear to be necessary or desirable. Upon approval of the proposed regulations and proposed state plan by the commissioner, such approved proposals shall constitute the state regulations and state plan.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 4; 1972, ch. 506, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-628, 14-14-404.

Cross-References. Division of services for the blind, §71-4-602.

71-4-605. Types of services — Workshops — Federal funds — Gifts.

All rehabilitation services, as defined in this part, may be provided under this part to eligible blind handicapped individuals, and in any event, such services shall include training, maintenance, placement, guidance and physical restoration services.

Within such limits and under such conditions as may be specified in appropriations for rehabilitation facilities and workshops for the blind, the department may establish rehabilitation facilities and workshops for the blind.

Appropriations, federal grants and donations for vocational rehabilitation services for the blind, unless otherwise restricted, shall be available for all vocational rehabilitation services for the blind provided under the state plan for the blind, and for the acquisition of vending stands or other equipment and initial stocks, including livestock, and supplies for use by blind individuals in any type of small business, the operation of which will be improved through management and supervision by the division.

State appropriations and donations for vocational rehabilitation of the blind shall likewise be available for the purpose, whenever federal funds are made available to the state under § 3 of the federal vocational rehabilitation of the blind amendments of 1954, for initiating projects for the extension and improvement of vocational rehabilitation services for the blind, or under § 4 of such act for projects for research, demonstrations, training and traineeships, and for planning for an initiating expansion of vocational rehabilitation services for the blind under the state plan for the blind.

The general assembly shall appropriate for vocational rehabilitation of the blind such sums as are necessary, along with available federal and other funds, to carry out the purposes of this part. The acceptance of such federal and other funds, and their use for vocational rehabilitation of the blind, subject to such restrictions as may be imposed by the donor and are not inconsistent with this part, is hereby authorized.

The state treasurer is hereby designated as the custodian of all funds received from the federal government for the purpose of carrying out any federal statutes pertaining to the vocational rehabilitation of the blind.

The director is hereby authorized and empowered with the approval of the commissioner to accept and use gifts made unconditionally by will or otherwise for carrying out the purposes of this part. Gifts made under such conditions, as in the judgment of the commissioner are proper and consistent with this part, may be so accepted and shall be held, invested, reinvested, and used in accordance with the conditions of the gift.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-629, 14-14-405.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

The federal act referred to in this section (Act Aug. 3, 1954, ch. 655, §§ 3, 4; 68 Stat. 662) is compiled in 20 U.S.C. §§ 107-107f.

71-4-606. Federal employees included.

Rehabilitation services provided under the state plan for the blind shall be available to any blind civil employee of the United States disabled while in the performance of the blind civil employee's duty, on the same terms and conditions as apply to other persons.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 14-630, 14-14-406.

71-4-607. Administration — Personnel — Rules and regulations.

The department is hereby authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations with respect to methods of administration, use of medical and other records of individuals who have been provided vocational rehabilitation services for the blind, and the establishment and maintenance of personnel standards, including provisions relating to the tenure, appointment and qualification of personnel, which shall govern with respect to such matters notwithstanding any other law; provided, that such activities must conform with any applicable rules and regulations of the department of human resources.

The department of human services is also authorized and directed to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations respecting:

The establishment and maintenance of minimum standards governing the facilities and personnel utilized in the provision of vocational rehabilitation services for the blind; and

The order to be followed in selecting those to whom vocational rehabilitation services are to be provided in situations where such services cannot be provided to all eligible blind people.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-631, 14-14-407.

71-4-608. Cooperation and utilization of other agencies.

Pursuant to the general policies of the department, the director and the division are authorized to:

Cooperate with and utilize the services of the state agency or agencies administering the state's public assistance program, the federal bureau of old-age and survivors insurance under the United States department of health and human services, and other federal, state and local public agencies providing services relating to vocational rehabilitation, and with the state system of public employment offices in the state, and shall make maximum feasible utilization of the job placement and employment counseling services and other services and facilities of such offices;

Cooperate with political subdivisions, other public and nonprofit organizations and agencies, in their establishment of workshops and rehabilitation facilities, and, to the extent feasible in providing vocational rehabilitation services, shall utilize all such facilities meeting the standards established by the department;

Enter into contractual arrangements with the federal bureau of old-age and survivors insurance under the United States department of health and human services, with respect to certifications of disability and performance of other services, and with other authorized public agencies for performance of services related to vocational rehabilitation, for such agencies;

Contract with schools, hospitals, and other agencies, and with doctors, nurses, technicians and other persons, for training, physical restoration, transportation, and other vocational rehabilitation services; and

Contract with a nonprofit organization or organizations for the management and operation of workshops for the blind located at Nashville and Memphis and, in fulfillment of the terms of such contract or contracts, lease the present workshop facilities to the organization or organizations for the period of time as specified in the contract; provided, that any contract entered into for this purpose shall not be effective until approved by the governor, attorney general and reporter, and comptroller of the treasury. Such contract shall also be governed by former § 12-4-109 [See the Compiler’s Notes] and the regulations promulgated pursuant to former § 12-4-109. A contractor that manages and operates a workshop under this subdivision (5) shall not be bound by enactments of the general assembly that govern:

The administration of personnel, including title 8, chapter 30;

The purchase of goods and services, including title 12, chapter 3 [see the Compiler’s Notes] and former §§ 12-4-109 and 12-4-110 [see the Compiler's Notes]; and

The administration, disposition, and inventory of property and surplus property, including title 12, chapter 2 and § 4-3-1105.

However, a contractor may purchase, inventory, and dispose of goods, property, and surplus property under these laws, with the approval of and under conditions set by the procurement commission. The department of general services may, upon request, purchase supplies and equipment for a contractor to manage and operate a facility. The purchases shall be made on the same terms and rules that govern the purchase of supplies and equipment by such department. The contractor shall pay for all such purchases. Any contractor operating a workshop under this subdivision (5) shall pay the minimum wage, unless a certificate of exemption is granted under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), as amended, and shall also comply with all other state and federal laws applying to employment in the private sector.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-632; Acts 1982, ch. 863, § 2; T.C.A., §14-14-408; Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3 was amended and reorganized by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Former §§12-4-109 and12-4-110, referred to in this section, were recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former §12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1 and 3. Provisions similar to former §12-4-110 were transferred to §12-3-303.

Provisions concerned old-age and survivors insurance, referred to in this section, are compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.

71-4-609. Maintenance not transferable — Exempt from creditors.

The right of a blind individual to maintenance under this part shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and shall be exempt from the claims of creditors.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 14-633, 14-14-409.

71-4-610. Hearing on grievances.

Any blind individual applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation who is aggrieved by any action of the vocational rehabilitation service for the blind shall be entitled in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner to a fair hearing, and the decision so made after such hearing shall be final.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 14-634, 14-14-410.

71-4-611. Illegal use of lists — Penalty.

It is unlawful, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of the vocational rehabilitation program, and in accordance with regulations, for any person or persons to solicit, disclose, receive, or make use of, or authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list of, or names of, or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or subdivisions or agencies of the state, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1955, ch. 243, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 14-635, 14-14-411; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-4-612. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.